Maine, session 132, LD2182.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 213-A is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 213-A
SETTLEMENT AGENT DUTY TO VERIFY SELLER OF REAL ESTATE
§1409. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Administrator. "Administrator" means the Superintendent of Consumer Credit
Protection within the Department of Professional and Financial Regulation.
2. Covered real estate transaction. "Covered real estate transaction" means a real
estate transaction involving vacant land or residential real estate in the State.
3. Settlement. "Settlement" means the receipt of loan funds, loan documents or other
documents or funds to carry out the contractual terms of a covered real estate transaction.
4. Settlement agency. "Settlement agency" means the person responsible for
conducting the settlement or disbursement of settlement proceeds in a covered real estate
transaction effecting the sale, transfer, encumbrance or lease to another person of real or
personal property located in this State. "Settlement agency" includes an individual,
corporation, limited liability company, partnership or other entity conducting the settlement
or disbursement of settlement proceeds.
5. Settlement agent. "Settlement agent" means a person engaged in the business of
settlements on behalf of a settlement agency.
§1410. Verification of seller identity
1. Duty. Beginning January 1, 2027, a settlement agent may not conduct a settlement
for a covered real estate transaction unless the settlement agent has verified the identity of
the person who is selling the property in accordance with the requirements set forth in rules
adopted under subsection 2.
2. Rulemaking. The administrator shall adopt rules governing the duty of a settlement
agent to verify the identity of the person who is selling property under subsection 1. The
administrator shall consult with the Real Estate Commission under Title 32, section 13062
prior to adoption or amendment of rules under this subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to
this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
2-A.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §13065, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Verification of seller identity. The commission shall adopt rules governing the
duty of a real estate brokerage agency to verify the identity of a seller before entering a
brokerage agreement with or providing services to any client who is the seller in a real
estate transaction as required by section 13177-A, subsection 3. The commission shall
consult with the Superintendent of Consumer Credit Protection within the Department of
Professional and Financial Regulation prior to adoption or amendment of rules under this
Page 1 - 132LR3002(01)

410 subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined
421 in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §13177-A, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Duty to verify identity of seller. Beginning January 1, 2027, a real estate brokerage
agency may not enter into a brokerage agreement with a seller or provide any services to a
client who is the seller in a real estate transaction unless the real estate broker or an associate
real estate broker or a real estate sales agent employed by or on behalf of the real estate
brokerage agency has verified the identity of the seller in accordance with the requirements
set forth in rules adopted by the commission pursuant to section 13065, subsection 3-A.